Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 2. Board of Education.
§ 22.1-19.
Accreditation of elementary, middle, and high schools; nursery schools; recognition of certain organizations; child day center regulation.

The Board shall provide for the accreditation of public elementary, middle, and high schools in accordance with standards prescribed by it. The Board may provide for the accreditation of private elementary, middle, and high schools in accordance with standards prescribed by it, taking reasonably into account the special circumstances and factors affecting such private schools. The Board in its discretion may recommend provisions for accreditation standards for private nursery schools. Any such accreditation shall be at the request of the private school only.

For the purposes of facilitating the transfer of academic credits for students who have attended private schools and are enrolling in public schools, and to meet the requirements of § 22.1-289.032, the Board of Education shall authorize, in a manner it deems appropriate, the Virginia Council for Private Education to accredit private nursery, preschool, elementary, and secondary schools.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-21; 1954, c. 326; 1968, c. 281; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 178; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 2000, c. 535; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2016, c. 442; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 83 and 172, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall adopt regulations adjusting the formula for calculating the final high school accreditation status as follows: for schools having met minimal accreditation requirements, a minimum numerical value of three points shall be added to the completion index total points calculation for each student obtaining (i) a diploma and (ii) an industry certification, industry pathway certification, a state licensure, or an occupational competency credential in a career and technical education program, when such certification, licensure, or credential is approved by the Board of Education as student-selected verified credit. The additional points shall not be used to obtain or deny accreditation.”

Acts 2015, cc. 367 and 368, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. No later than July 1, 2016, the Board of Education, in consultation with the Standards of Learning Innovation Committee, shall redesign the School Performance Report Card so that it is more effective in communicating to parents and the public the status and achievements of the public schools and local school divisions in the Commonwealth. The Board, in redesigning the School Performance Report Card, may consider (i) the standards of accreditation, (ii) state and federal accountability requirements, (iii) state-mandated assessments, (iv) any alternative assessments developed or approved for use by the relevant local school board, (v) student growth indicators, (vi) student mobility, (vii) the experience and qualifications of school staff, (viii) total cost and funding per pupil, (ix) school safety, and (x) any other factors that the Board deems necessary to produce a full and accurate statement of performance for each public elementary and secondary school and local school division in the Commonwealth. No later than October 1, 2015, the Board shall provide notice and solicit public comment on the redesigned School Performance Report Card. No later than December 1, 2015, the Board shall make a summary of the redesigned School Performance Report Card available to the public and submit such summary to the Chairman of the House Committee on Education and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Education and Health. No later than October 1, 2016, and each October 1 thereafter, the Board shall make available to the public a School Performance Report Card for each public elementary and secondary school and local school division in the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 535 added the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 75, are identical, and substituted “State Board of Social Services” for “Child Day Care Council” in the last paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 442 deleted “The Board shall promulgate accreditation regulations that incorporate, but may exceed, the regulations for child day centers promulgated by the State Board of Social Services, for those child day centers described in subdivision A 7 of §

63.2-1715

” from the end of the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first paragraph in the penultimate sentence, inserted “accreditation” and in the last paragraph, substituted “§ 22.1-289.032” for “§ 63.2-1717.”

§ 22.1-19.1.
Action for violations related to secure mandatory tests.

The Office of the Attorney General, on behalf of the Board of Education, may bring a cause of action in the circuit court having jurisdiction where the person resides or where the act occurred for injunctive relief, civil penalty, or both, against any person who knowingly and willfully commits any of the following acts related to secure mandatory tests required by the Board to be administered to students:

Permitting unauthorized access to secure test questions prior to testing;

Copying or reproducing all or any portion of any secure test booklet;

Divulging the contents of any portion of a secure test;

Altering test materials or examinees’ responses in any way;

Creating or making available answer keys to secure tests;

Making a false certification on the test security form established by the Department of Education;

Excluding students from testing who are required to be assessed; or

Participating in, directing, aiding or abetting, or assisting in any of the acts prohibited in this section.For the purpose of this subsection, “secure” means an item, question, or test that has not been made publicly available by the Department of Education.

Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit or restrict the reasonable and necessary actions of the Board of Education, Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Department of Education or their agents or employees engaged in test development or selection, test form construction, standard setting, test scoring, reporting test scores, or any other related activities which, in the judgment of the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Board of Education, are necessary and appropriate.

Any person who violates any provisions of this section may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each violation. Furthermore, any person whose administrative or teaching license has been suspended or revoked pursuant to § 22.1-292.1 may be assessed a civil penalty for the same violation under this section and the reasonable costs of any review or investigation of a violation of test security.All civil penalties paid to the Commonwealth pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Literary Fund.

For the purpose of this section, “person” shall not mean a student enrolled in a public school.

History.

2000, cc. 634, 659; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2006, cc. 25, 95; 2011, c. 248.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s note under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and inserted “test materials or” in subdivision A 4.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 25 and 95 are identical, and in subsection C, divided the former provisions of the first paragraph into two sentences, by
substituting “Furthermore” for “however” and substituted “may” for “shall not” and added “and the reasonable costs of any review or investigation of a violation of test security” in the second sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 248 added subdivision A 7 and made a related change; redesignated former subdivision A 7 as subdivision A 8; and added subsection D.

§ 22.1-20.
Retention of pupil personnel records.

The Board of Education is authorized to promulgate regulations governing the retention of pupil personnel records in public schools.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-53.1; 1968, c. 351; 1970, c. 154; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-20.1.
Powers and duties of the Board related to public broadcasting stations; disbursement of funds.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Public broadcasting station” means any noncommercial, educational television or radio station that (i) is licensed and regulated by the Federal Communications Commission as a noncommercial, educational broadcasting station; (ii) is operated by a public agency or a nonprofit private foundation, corporation, or association; (iii) has offices and studios located in Virginia; and (iv) on or before January 1, 1997, was qualified to receive or was the recipient of a Virginia community service grant or other instructional television service funds, or, after January 1, 1997, until July 1, 2012, was qualified by the Virginia Public Broadcasting Board to receive state funds under standards and criteria established by the Virginia Public Broadcasting Board pursuant to law, or, after July 1, 2012, was qualified by the Board of Education in accordance with this section. Public broadcasting station shall not include any institution of higher education that produces or transmits distance education and other credit and noncredit television programs, unless such institution requests qualification as a public broadcasting station and the Board of Education approves its request.

The Board shall have the power and duty to:

Receive, allocate, and dispense funds appropriated by the General Assembly and funds received by the Board from other sources, subject to the approval of the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget;

Develop reasonable and fair formulas for allocating and distributing state funds and other funds of the Board to Virginia’s public broadcasting stations consistent with the intent of such appropriations;

Apply for, accept, and receive grants of federal funds and funds from other public and private sources;

Adopt, administer, and apply standards and criteria by which the Board may permit television and radio stations to qualify as public broadcasting stations if those stations did not qualify for or receive Virginia community service grants or other instructional television service funds as of January 1, 1997, but otherwise qualify as such under the definition of a public broadcasting station. To avoid unnecessary duplication of public broadcasting services, the Board shall consider: (i) the adequacy of existing programming, coverage, and other public broadcasting services in the geographic area to be served and the extent to which those services would be duplicated by an additional public broadcasting station and (ii) the sufficiency of funds administered by the Board to support existing or proposed public broadcasting stations;

Coordinate such strategic planning by the public broadcasting stations as the Board deems appropriate and identify and communicate to the Governor and the General Assembly the funding and other requirements of Virginia’s public broadcasting stations; and

Enter into contracts with public broadcasting stations, state agencies and institutions, public schools, and private entities for goods and services.

The Director of the Department of Planning and Budget shall oversee and approve the disbursement of all funds appropriated to the Board for the purposes enumerated in this section. Upon approval, the funds of the Board shall be disbursed for the following general purposes:

Annual operating-grant-funding to public broadcasting stations for developing, acquiring, producing, and distributing programs and related services that support local needs of preschool and adult education; disseminating information to the citizenry regarding the government and its affairs; promoting tourism and enhancing the Commonwealth’s economic development; and supporting other programs that inform, educate, and entertain the citizenry with noncommercial programming.

Annual contract-funding to public broadcasting stations to regionally manage and provide programming and related services that directly support the instructional activities of local schools and home educators.

Matching-capital-funding to public broadcasting stations for construction and equipment modernization to keep Virginia stations consistent with industry standards.

Funding for specific programs and projects to be provided by a public broadcasting station that may not be included in another funding category.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 57.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “in §

2.2-1122

” in subdivision B 4 in the first sentence at the end.

§ 22.1-20.2.
Student data security.

The Department of Education shall develop, in collaboration with the Virginia Information Technologies Agency, and update regularly but in no case less than annually, a model data security plan for the protection of student data held by school divisions. Such model plan shall include (i) guidelines for access to student data and student data systems, including guidelines for authentication of authorized access; (ii) privacy compliance standards; (iii) privacy and security audits; (iv) procedures to follow in the event of a breach of student data; and (v) data retention and disposition policies. The model plan and any updates shall be made available to every school division.

The Department of Education shall designate a chief data security officer, with such state funds as made available, to assist school divisions, upon request, with the development and implementation of their own data security plans and to develop best practice recommendations regarding the use, retention, and protection of student data.

History.

2015, c. 561.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 561, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education may convene a working group to assist with the development of initial instructions, procedures, services, security assessments, best practices, and security measures required by this act for the development of a model student data security plan. Such working group shall include the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chief Information Officer of the Commonwealth, the Chief Security Officer of the Commonwealth, representatives from each of the eight superintendent regions, and other parties deemed necessary by the Department. If convened, the working group shall submit a report on or before July 1, 2016, to the chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance on the cost of developing a model student data security plan.”

§ 22.1-20.3.
Granting easements across lands of certain schools and institutions.

The Board may, subject to the prior written approval of the Governor, convey upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as it deems proper easements upon, over, across, or under the property of any school or educational institution for which it serves as the governing board, to any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, public utility, public service company, or cable television company for the purpose of erecting or maintaining power, telephone, cable television, water, sewer, or gas lines and mains, provided that any such deed or other conveyance shall be in a form approved by the Attorney General and that any funds received by the Board in consideration for granting any such easement shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

1952, c. 74, § 23-9.1; 1958, c. 47; 1986, c. 536; 2016, c. 588.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2016 act having been § 22.1-20.2.

Editor’s note.

Section 23-9.1 is recodified as § 22.1-20.2, effective October 1, 2016, by Acts 2016, c. 588. The section was renumbered as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission. For full transition provisions related to the recodification of Title 23, see Editor’s notes under §

23.1-100

.

§ 22.1-20.4.
Alternative assessments for students who are English language learners.

The Board of Education shall consider assessments aligned to the Standards of Learning that are structured and formatted in a way that measures the content knowledge of students who are English language learners and that may be administered to such students as Board of Education-approved alternatives to Standards of Learning end-of-course English reading assessments.

History.

2016, cc. 58, 516.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 58 and 516 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.